DI-4 DIAGNOSTICS - ABS & VEHICLE STABILITY CONTROL (VSC) &
BRAKE ASSIST (BA) SYSTEM

DI6X0-01

PRE-CHECK

1. DIAGNOSIS SYSTEM
(@ Check the warning lights and buzzer.
(1) Release parking brake lever.
(20 When the ignition switch is turned ON, check that
the ABS, VSC TRC and BRAKE warning lights,
VSC OFF, SLIP and ACTIVE TRC indicator lights
goes on for 3 sec.
N F10034 (3) When depressing the brake pedal repeatedly it may

turn on the warning lights and buzzer.

. If the ECU stores DTC, VSC TRC warning light and VSC
OFF indicator light is ON.

. If the indicator check result is not normal, proceed to trou-
bleshooting for the ABS warning light circuit, VSC TRC
warning light circuit, BRAKE warning light circuit, VSC
OFF indicator light circuit, SLIP indicator light circuit and
ACTIVE TRC indicator light circuit.

Trouble Area See Page

ABS warning light circuit DI-133
VSC TRC warning light circuit DI-138
BRAKE warning light circuit DI-144
VSC OFF indicator light circuit DI-156
SLIP indicator light circuit DI-149
ACTIVE TRC indicator light circuit DI-153
(b) Incaseofnotusinghand  —heldtester:

Check the DTC.

1) Usi T inals T E fcheck
Check Connector (1) Using SST, connectterminals Tc and , ofchec

E connector.
1 (0= g SST09843 -18020
: T (2)  Turn the ignition switch ON.
U [D:] (3) Read the DTC from the ABS or VSC TRC warning

light on the combination meter.

AN d N G:I HINT:

. Ifno code appears, inspectthe Tccircuit, ABS or VSC

Tc Fo2201 TRCwarning light circuit.
Trouble Area See page
Tc circuit DI-164
ABS warning light circuit DI-133
VSC TRC warning light circuit DI-138
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. As an example, the blinking patterns for normal code and
codes 11 and 21 are shown on the left.
Codes are explained in the code table on page

(4)
()

DI-15.

After completing the check, disconnect terminals Tc

andE ’ of check connector andturn offthe display.
If 2 or more malfunctions are indicated at the same time the low-
est numbered DTC will be displayed 1st.

(c)Incaseofusinghand -heldtester:
Check the DTC.
(1)Hookupthehand -heldtestertothe DLCS.

(2) Turntheignition switch ON.
Read the DTC by following the prompts on the tes-

(3)

HINT:

Pleaserefertothe hand

ter screen.

ther details.

(d) Incase of notusing hand

—heldtester:

Clear the DTC.

(1) Using SST, connectterminals Tcand E

connector.

SST 09843 -18020

@)
(3)

Turn the ignition switch ON.

-heldtester operator’'s manual for fur-

’ of check

Clear the DTC stored in ECU by depressing the

brake pedal 8 or more times within 5 sec.
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(4) Check that the warning light shows the normal
code.

(5) Remove the SST from the terminals of check con-
nector.

SST09843 -18020

(e) Incaseofusinghand  -heldtester:
Clear the DTC.
(1)Hookupthehand -heldtestertothe DLCS.
(2) Turntheignition switch ON.
(8) Operatethehand -heldtesterto erasethe codes.
(Seehand -heldtester operator’'s manual.)

Hand-held
Tester

RHD:

Hand-held
Tester

A05868

()  Reference:
Hand-held Tester Usingbreak —out-boxandhand -heldtester, measurethe
ECU terminal values.
(1) Turn the ignition switch OFF.
(2) Hookupthebreak -out-boxandhand -heldtester
to the vehicle.
: (8)  Turn the ignition switch ON.
Break—out-box—— (4) Read the ECU input/output values by following the
N09348 prompts on the tester screen.

. Hand-heldtester has a”Snapshot” function. Thisrecords
the measured values and is effective in the diagnosis of
intermittent problems.

. Pleaserefertothehand -heldtester/break —out-boxop-
erator’s manual for further details.
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2.
HINT:
If the

SPEED SENSOR SIGNAL CHECK (TEST MODE)

ignition switch is turned from ON to ACC or LOCK during

test mode, DTC will be erased.
(@) Incaseofnotusinghand  -heldtester:

HINT:

Check the speed sensor signal.

(1) Turn the ignition switch OFF.

(2) Using SST, connectterminals Tsand E ] ofcheck
connector.

SST 09843 -18020

(3) Start the engine. -

(4) Check that the ABS warning light blinks.

If the ABS warning light does not blink, inspect the ABS warning
light circuit and Ts circuit (See page DI-133 and DI-166).

HINT:

(5) Keep the vehicle in the stationary condition on the
flat place for 6 sec. or more.

(6) Shift the transfer lever in L4 position and turn the
center diff. lock switch ON.

(7) Leavingthe vehicle inthe stationary conditionand
the brake pedal in free condition for 1 sec. or more,
continue to depress the brake pedal with 98 N (10
kgf, 22 Ibf) of force or more for 1 sec. or more.

(8) Leaving the vehicle in the stationary condition, de-
press the brake pedal with 980 N (100 kgf, 221 Ibf)
of force or more quickly.

At this time, the ABS warning light comes on for 3 sec.

HINT:

(9) Drive vehicle straight forward.
When driving the vehicle with the speed faster than
45 km/h (28 mph) for several seconds, check that
the ABS warning light comes off.

There is a case that the sensor check is not completed if the ve-
hicle has its rear wheels spun or its steering wheel steered dur-
ing this check.

(10) Stop the vehicle.

(11) Using SST, connectterminals Tcand E ’ ofcheck
connector.

SST09843 -18020

(12) Read the number of blinks of the ABS warning light.
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HINT:
S
S

See the list of DTC shown on the next page.

If every sensor is normal, a normal code is output (A cycle

of 0.25 sec. ON and 0.25 sec. OFF is repeated).

If 2 or more malfunctions are indicated at the same time,

the lowest numbered code will be displayed 1st.

(13) After doing the check, disconnect the SST from ter-
minals Ts and E1, Tc and E; of check connector and
turn ignition switch OFF.

SST 09843-18020

Malfunction Code (Example Code 72, 76)
7 2 7 6

s ~~ —N r A\ ™~ r N

- Hﬂﬂmm_muww
OFF 1B .

.5 sec. ‘ 2.5 sec. ‘ 4 sec.
0.5 sec. 0.5 sec. — ‘
0.5sec. 0.5 sec. Repeat
BR3893

RHD:

Tester

Hand-held

A05868
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(b)

HINT:

In case of using hand-held tester:

Check the sensor signal.

(1) Hook up the hand-held tester to the DLC3.

(2) Do step (3) and (4) to (10) on the previous page.

(3) Read the DTC by following the prompts on the tes-
ter screen.

Please refer to the hand—held tester operator’'s manual for fur-
ther details.
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DTC of speed sensor check function:

Code No. Diagnosis Trouble Area
SRight front speed sensor
C1271/71 Low output voltage of right front speed sensor SSensor installation
SSensor rotor
SLeft front speed sensor
C1272/72 Low output voltage of left front speed sensor SSensor installation
SSensor rotor
SRight rear speed sensor
C1273/73 Low output voltage of right rear speed sensor SSensor installation
SSensor rotor
SLeft rear speed sensor
C1274 /74 Low output voltage of left rear speed sensor SSensor installation
SSensor rotor
Abnormal change in output voltage of right front speed .
C1275/75 Right front speed sensor rotor
sensor
Abnormal change in output voltage of left front speed
C1276 /76 Left front speed sensor rotor
sensor
Abnormal change in output voltage of right rear speed )
C1277177 Right rear speed sensor rotor
sensor
Abnormal change in output voltage of left rear speed
C1278/78 Left rear speed sensor rotor
sensor
. . SDeceleration sensor
C1279/79 Deceleration sensor is faulty . .
SSensor installation
C1281/81 Master cylinder pressure sensor output signal is faulty Master cylinder pressure sensor
C1282/ 82 Transfer indicator (center diff. lock) switch malfunction Transfer indicator (center diff. lock) switch
C1283/83 Transfer L4 position switch malfunction Transfer L4 position switch

=]

3. In case of not using hand-held tester:

Check Connector VSC SENSOR CHECK (TEST MODE)

(0= HINT:

test mode, DTC will be erased.

O T @ If the ignition switch is turned from ON to ACC or LOCK during

AN d -

CD (a) Procedures for test mode:
(1) Turn the ignition switch OFF.

(2) Check that the shift lever position is at P range, turn
Tc F02201 the steering wheel to the neutral range.

(3) Using SST, connect terminals Ts and E; of check
connector.

SST 09843-18020

(4) Start the engine.

LAND CRUISER (W/G) SUP (RM731E)
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ON

OFF

0.13 sec.

0.13 sec.

BR3904
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(5) Check that the VSC TRC warning light blinks.
HINT:
If the VSC TRC warning light does not blink, inspect the VSC
TRC warning light circuit and Ts terminal circuit (See page
DI-138 and DI-166).
(b) When replacing yaw rate sensor and/or ECU, the first
time only:
Perform the yaw rate sensor zero point calibration.
HINT:
Before the yaw rate sensor zero point calibration, shift the shift
lever to P range, turn the ignition switch ON, and repeat con-
necting and disconnecting between terminals Ts and E; of
check connector 4 times or more for 8 sec. After this, leave the
vehicle in stationary condition for 15 sec. and carry out the yaw
rate sensor zero point calibration.
Place the vehicle on the horizontal surface and carry out
the zero point calibration of the yaw rate sensor by turning
the ignition switch ON.
HINT:
After turning the ignition switch ON, keep the vehicle stationary
condition until the VSC TRC warning changes from lighting to

light—out.
(c) Whenreplacing deceleration sensor and/or ECU, the first
time only:

Perform the deceleration sensor zero point calibration.
HINT:
Before the deceleration sensor zero point calibration, shift the
shift lever to P range, turn the ignition switch ON, and repeat
connecting and disconnecting between terminals Ts and E4 of
check connector 4 times or more for 8 sec. Then, short circuit
the check connector between Ts and E4 again and turn the igni-
tion switch ON. After this, leave the vehicle in stationary condi-
tion for 15 sec. and carry out the deceleration sensor zero point
calibration.
Place the vehicle on the horizontal surface and carry out
the zero point calibration of the deceleration sensor by
turning the ignition switch ON.
HINT:
After turning the ignition switch ON, keep the vehicle stationary
condition until the VSC TRC warning changes from lighting to
blinking in about 2 seconds.
NOTICE:
Do not turn OFF the ignition switch within 2 seconds after
VSC TRC warning starts blinking.
(d) Check the steering angle sensor.
Turn the steering wheel either to left or right for 450° or
more from the vehicle stationary condition, and turn back
the steering wheel to the straight ahead position.
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Start Position (e)

Within + 5°

Check the yaw rate sensor.
Shift the shift lever to the D range and drive the vehicle at
the vehicle speed of approx. 5 km/h (3 mph), turn the
steering wheel either to left or right for 90° or more, and
maintain 180° circular drive for the vehicle.
Stop the vehicle and shift the shift lever to the P
range, check that the VSC buzzer sounds for 3 sec.

If the VSC buzzer sounded, the sensor check is in normal

End Position rFoz13s| completion.

If the VSC buzzer does not sound, do the sensor check again.
If the VSC buzzer still won't sound, there is malfunction in the
VSC sensor, so check the DTC.

HINT:

S

S
(f)

HINT:

Drive the vehicle circularly by 180°. At the end of the turn,

the direction of the vehicle should be within 180° + 5° of

its start position.

Do not spin the rear wheels.

Do not shift the shift lever to P range during the turn.

Do not stop the vehicle during the turn.

Read the DTC.

(1) Using SST, connect terminals Tc and E; of check
connector.

SST 09843-18020

(2) Readthe number of blinks of the VSC TRC warning
light.

See the list of DTC shown on the next page.

If every sensor is normal, a normal code is output. (A cycle
of 0.25 sec. ON and 0.25 sec. OFF is repeated.)

If 2 or more malfunctions are indicated at the same time,
the lowest numbered code will be displayed 1st.

Malfunction Code (Example Code 71, 72)

0.5sec. 75 sec,

—

72

ON

OFF

UL, ]l

0.5 sec. 1.5 sec.

4 sec.
Repeat

LAND CRUISER (W/G) SUP (RM731E)
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RHD:

Hand-held
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(3) After doing the check, disconnect the SST from ter-
minals Ts and E,, Tc and E4 of check connector and
turn ignition switch OFF.
SST 09843-18020
4. In case of using hand-held tester:

Hand-held
Tester ()

A05868

DTC of the VSC sensor check function:

CHECK VSC SENSOR SIGNAL
(@) Hook up the hand-held tester to the DLC3.
Do steps (a) — (2), (a) — (4) and (b) to (e) on the previous

pages.

(c) Read the DTC by following the prompts on the tester
screen.

HINT:

Please refer to the hand—-held tester operator’'s manual for fur-
ther details.

Code No. Diagnosis Trouble Area
) ) SYaw rate sensor
C0371/71 Yaw rate sensor output signal malfunction N
SYaw rate sensor circuit
) n ) ) S Steering position sensor
C1208/ 72 Steering position sensor output signal malfunction

S Steering position sensor circuit

5. DECELERATION SENSOR OPERATION DIAGNOSIS
SYSTEM

CAUTION:

While checking the deceleration sensor operating diagno-
sis system, ABS does not work and brake system works as
a conventional brake system.

LAND CRUISER (W/G) SUP (RM731E)
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l

o
[eXeXeXe)

Rearward

Forward

F02098
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6. DECELERATION SENSOR CHECK

(@) Connect 3 dry batteries of 1.5 V in series.

(b) Connect VGS terminal to the batteries’ positive (+) termi-
nal, and GGND terminal to the batteries’ negative (-) ter-
minal, apply about 4.5 V between VGS and GGND termi-
nals.

NOTICE:

Do not apply voltage of 6 V or more to terminals VGS and

GGND.

(c) Check the output voltage of GL1 and GL2 terminals.

Symbols Condition Standard Value
GL1 Horizontal About 2.3V
GL1 Lean forward 0.4V -about 2.3V
GL1 Lean rearward About2.3V -4.1V
GL2 Horizontal About 2.3V
GL2 Lean forward About2.3V-4.1V
GL2 Lean rearward 0.4V -about 2.3V
HINT:
S Ifthe sensor is tilted too much it may show the wrong val-
ue.

If dropped, the sensor should be replaced with a new one.
The sensor removed from the vehicle should not be
placed upside down.
(d) When replacing the deceleration sensor:
Perform the deceleration sensor zero point calibration.
Shift the shift lever in P range and turn the ignition
switch ON, repeat connecting and releasing Ts and
E1 terminals of check connector 4 times or more for
8 sec. After that do not move the vehicle for 15 sec.
or more.
HINT:
Before the deceleration sensor zero point calibration, be sure
to short circuit the check connector between Ts and E; and per-
form the calibration in test mode.
7.  YAW RATE SENSOR ZERO POINT CALIBRATION
HINT:
When replacing the yaw rate sensor or ECU, make sure to per-
form yaw rate sensor zero point calibration.
(@) When replacing the ECU:
After replacing ECU, shift the shift lever in P range and
turn the ignition switch ON. Do not move the vehicle for
15 sec. or more.
HINT:
At this time, the VSC TRC warning light and VSC OFF indicator
light goes on for 15 sec. and goes off. If the VSC TRC warning
light and VSC OFF indicator light remains on, carry out yaw rate
sensor and deceleration sensor zero point calibration in the test
mode.



DI-14

DIAGNOSTICS - ABS & VEHICLE STABILITY CONTROL (VSC) &
BRAKE ASSIST (BA) SYSTEM

LAND CRUISER (W/G) SUP (RM731E)

(b)  When replacing the yaw rate sensor:
Shift the shift lever in P range and turn the ignition switch
ON, repeat connecting and releasing Ts and E; terminals
of check connector 4 times or more for 8 sec. After that do
not move the vehicle for 15 sec. or more.

HINT:

When the operation (b) is performed, DTC is deleted.



